trunk/apertium-hbs-slv/apertium-hbs-slv.hbs.metadix
    <pardef n="perf_tv_proživ/jeti__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><par n="e_je__yat"/><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__tv__vblex__perf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><par n="e_je_right__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><par n="e_je_right__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__im__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><par n="e_je__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><par n="e_je_right__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="lp_iti__sfx"/></e>
      <e><par n="e_je__yat"/><p><l>vši</l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--verbose adverbs-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="imperf_iv_žel/jeti__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><par n="e_je__yat"/><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__iv__vblex__imperf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><par n="e_je_right__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><par n="e_je_right__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__im__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Imperfect-->
      <e><par n="e_je__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="imperf__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><par n="e_je__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><par n="e_je_right__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="lp_iti__sfx"/></e>
      <!--    <e><par n="e_e_left__yat"/><par n="e_e_right__yat"/><p><l>ći</l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>--><!--verbose adverbs-->
      <e><par n="e_e_left__yat"/><par n="e_e_right__yat"/><p><l>ći</l><r>ći<s n="vblex"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--simple adverbs-->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="imperf_ref_žel/jeti__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><par n="e_je__yat"/><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__ref__vblex__imperf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><par n="e_je_right__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><par n="e_je_right__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__im__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Imperfect-->
      <e><par n="e_je__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="imperf__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><par n="e_je__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><par n="e_je_right__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="lp_iti__sfx"/></e>
      <!--    <e><par n="e_e_left__yat"/><par n="e_e_right__yat"/><p><l>ći</l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>--><!--verbose adverbs-->
      <e><par n="e_e_left__yat"/><par n="e_e_right__yat"/><p><l>ći</l><r>ći<s n="vblex"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--simple adverbs-->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="imperf_tv_žel/jeti__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><par n="e_je__yat"/><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__tv__vblex__imperf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><par n="e_je_right__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><par n="e_je_right__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__im__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Imperfect-->
      <e><par n="e_je__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="imperf__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><par n="e_je__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><par n="e_je_right__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="lp_iti__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>jen</l><r></r></p><par n="e_je_right__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pp_sfx_extra__vblex"/></e>
      <!--    <e><par n="e_e_left__yat"/><par n="e_je_right__yat"/><p><l>ći</l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>--><!--verbose adverbs-->
      <e><par n="e_e_left__yat"/><par n="e_je_right__yat"/><p><l>ći</l><r>ći<s n="vblex"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--simple adverbs-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="perf_iv_požel/jeti__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><par n="e_je__yat"/><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__iv__vblex__perf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><par n="e_je_right__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><par n="e_je_right__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__im__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><par n="e_je__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><par n="e_je_right__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="lp_iti__sfx"/></e>
      <e><par n="e_je__yat"/><p><l>vši</l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--verbose adverbs-->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perf_ref_požel/jeti__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><par n="e_je__yat"/><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__ref__vblex__perf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><par n="e_je_right__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><par n="e_je_right__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__im__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><par n="e_je__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><par n="e_je_right__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="lp_iti__sfx"/></e>
      <e><par n="e_je__yat"/><p><l>vši</l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--verbose adverbs-->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perf_tv_požel/jeti__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><par n="e_je__yat"/><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__tv__vblex__perf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><par n="e_je_right__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><par n="e_je_right__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__im__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><par n="e_je__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><par n="e_je_right__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="lp_iti__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>jen</l><r></r></p><par n="e_je_right__yat"/><p><l></l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pp_sfx_extra__vblex"/></e>
      <e><par n="e_je__yat"/><p><l>vši</l><r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--verbose adverbs-->
    </pardef>

    <e lm="letjeti"><i>let</i><par n="imperf_iv_žel/jeti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zavidjeti"><i>zavid</i><par n="imperf_iv_žel/jeti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="uzletjeti"><i>uzlet</i><par n="perf_iv_požel/jeti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sletjeti"><i>slet</i><par n="perf_iv_požel/jeti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="poletjeti"><i>polet</i><par n="perf_iv_požel/jeti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="željeti"><i>žel</i><par n="imperf_tv_žel/jeti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="poželjeti"><i>požel</i><par n="perf_tv_požel/jeti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="voljeti"><i>vol</i><par n="imperf_tv_žel/jeti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="voljeti"><i>vol</i><par n="imperf_ref_žel/jeti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zavoljeti"><i>zavol</i><par n="perf_tv_požel/jeti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zavoljeti"><i>zavol</i><par n="perf_ref_požel/jeti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="moljeti"><i>mol</i><par n="imperf_iv_žel/jeti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="moljeti"><i>mol</i><par n="imperf_tv_žel/jeti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="moljeti"><i>mol</i><par n="imperf_ref_žel/jeti__vblex"/></e>
